Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by credentials, see 12 AAC 54, art. 2.

For occupational therapy licensure, see 12 AAC 54, art. 5.

Sec. 08.84.030.
Qualifications for licensing.

To be eligible for licensure by the board as a physical therapist or physical therapy assistant, an applicant, unless a graduate of a foreign school of physical therapy located outside the United States, shall

have graduated from a school of physical therapy approved by the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of the American Medical Association, or the American Physical Therapy Association;

pass to the satisfaction of the board an examination prepared by a national testing service approved by the board to determine the applicant’s fitness for practice as a physical therapist or physical therapy assistant, or be entitled to licensure without examination as provided in AS

08.84.060

;

meet qualifications for licensure established in regulations adopted by the board under AS

08.84.010(b)

.

To be eligible for licensure by the board as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant, an applicant, unless a graduate of a foreign school of occupational therapy located outside the United States, shall

have successfully completed a curriculum of occupational therapy approved by the Committee of Allied Health Education and Accreditation of the American Medical Association or the American Occupational Therapy Association;

submit proof of successful completion and supervised field work approved by the board

for an occupational therapist, a minimum of six months of supervised field work;

for an occupational therapy assistant, a minimum of two months of supervised field work;

pass, to the satisfaction of the board, an examination prepared by a national testing service approved by the board or an examination recognized by the American Occupational Therapy Association to determine the applicant’s fitness for practice as an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant, or be entitled to licensure without examination under AS

08.84.060

; and

meet qualifications for licensure established in regulations adopted by the board under AS

08.84.010(b)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 74 SLA 1957; am §§ 1, 8 ch 49 SLA 1969; am §§ 1, 2 ch 26 SLA 1970; am § 25 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by examination, see 12 AAC 54, art. 1.

For physical therapy licensure by credentials, see 12 AAC 54, art. 2.

For occupational therapy licensure, see 12 AAC 54, art. 5.

For occupational therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 7.

Sec. 08.84.032.
Foreign-trained applicants.

To be eligible for licensure by the board as a physical therapist or physical therapy assistant, an applicant who is a graduate of a school of physical therapy that is located outside of the United States shall

have completed, to the satisfaction of the board, a resident course of study and professional instruction equivalent to that provided by a school approved by the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of the American Medical Association or the American Physical Therapy Association, and furnish documentary evidence of compliance with this paragraph, translated, if necessary, into the English language by a person verifying the accuracy of the translations;

have completed, to the satisfaction of the board, an internship under the continuous direction and immediate supervision of a physical therapist in an institution that ordinarily provides physical therapy and is approved by the board, for that period of time specified by the board, and furnish documentary evidence of compliance with this paragraph;

pass an examination recognized by the board that measures the competence of the applicant in the English language;

have met applicable requirements under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 1101 et seq.), unless a United States citizen;

pass the examination administered by the board under AS

08.84.030(a)(2)

; and

pay the fee required under AS

08.84.050

.

To be eligible for licensure by the board as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant, an applicant who is a graduate of a school of occupational therapy that is located outside of the United States shall

have completed, to the satisfaction of the board, a resident course of study and professional instruction equivalent to that provided by a curriculum approved by the Committee of Allied Health Education and Accreditation of the American Medical Association or the American Occupational Therapy Association, and have furnished documentary evidence of compliance with this paragraph, translated, if necessary, into the English language by a person verifying the accuracy of the translations;

have completed, to the satisfaction of the board, supervised field work equivalent to that required under AS

08.84.030(b)

;

pass an examination recognized by the board that measures the competence of the applicant in the English language;

have met applicable requirements under 8 U.S.C. 1101 — 1503 (Immigration and Nationality Act) unless a United States citizen;

pass an examination administered or approved by the board under AS

08.84.030

; and

pay the fee required under AS

08.84.050

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 46 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 1997)

Revisor's notes. —

A reference to AS

08.84.030

(a)(2) was substituted for a reference to AS

08.84.030

(3) in (a)(5) of this section in 1990 to correct manifest errors of omission in ch. 2, FSSLA 1987 and ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by examination, see 12 AAC 54, art. 1.

For physical therapy licensure by credentials, see 12 AAC 54, art. 2.

For occupational therapy licensure, see 12 AAC 54, art. 5.

Editor's notes. --

In 1994, the American Medical Association replaced the “Committee of Allied Health Education and Accreditation of the American Medical Association” with the “Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs”.

Sec. 08.84.035.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.84.040.
Application for license.

To be licensed under this chapter to practice physical therapy or occupational therapy, an applicant shall apply to the board on a form prescribed by the board.
An applicant shall include in the application evidence under oath that the applicant possesses the qualifications required by AS

08.84.030

or

08.84.032

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by examination, see 12 AAC 54, art. 1.

For physical therapy licensure by credentials, see 12 AAC 54, art. 2.

Sec. 08.84.050.
Fees.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for the following:

application;

license by examination;

license by acceptance of credentials;

renewal;

temporary permit;

limited permit.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 1969; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 47 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.84.060.
Licensure by acceptance of credentials.

The board may license without examination an applicant who is a physical therapist, physical therapy assistant, occupational therapist, or occupational therapy assistant licensed under the laws of another state, if the requirements for licensure in that state, were, at the date of the applicant’s licensure, substantially equal to the requirements in this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 4 ch 26 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by credentials, see 12 AAC 54, art. 2.

For occupational therapy licensure, see 12 AAC 54, art. 5.

Sec. 08.84.065.
Temporary permit.

The board may issue a nonrenewable temporary permit to an applicant for licensure by acceptance of credentials or by examination who

meets the requirements of

AS

08.84.030(a)(1)

or (b)(1); or

AS

08.84.032(a)(2)

and (4) or (b)(2) and (4); and

pays the required fee.

A temporary permit issued to an applicant for licensure by acceptance of credentials is valid for eight months or until the board considers the applicant’s application for acceptance of credentials, whichever occurs first.

A temporary permit issued to an applicant for licensure as a physical therapist or physical therapy assistant by examination is valid for eight months or until the results of the first examination for which the applicant is scheduled are published, whichever occurs first. If the applicant fails to take the first examination for which the applicant is scheduled the applicant’s temporary permit lapses on the day of the examination.

A temporary permit issued to an applicant who is a graduate of a foreign school of physical therapy or occupational therapy located outside the United States is valid until the results of the first examination for which the applicant is scheduled are published following completion of the internship required under AS

08.84.032

.

A temporary permit issued to an applicant for licensure as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant by examination is valid for eight months or until the results of the examination for which the applicant is scheduled are published, whichever occurs first. If the applicant fails to take an examination for which the applicant is scheduled the applicant’s temporary permit lapses on the day of the examination.

History.

(§ 5 ch 26 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 7 ch 55 SLA 1980; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 9 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 47 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by examination, see 12 AAC 54, art. 1.

For occupational therapy licensure, see 12 AAC 54, art. 5.

For occupational therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 7.

Sec. 08.84.070.
Registration fee. [Repealed, § 8 ch 49 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 08.84.075.
Limited permit.

The board may issue a limited permit to a person to practice occupational therapy in the state as a visiting, nonresident occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant, if the person

applies on the form provided by the board;

has not previously been denied occupational therapy licensure in the state;

is licensed to practice occupational therapy in another state or satisfies the requirements for certification by the American Occupational Therapy Association;

provides proof satisfactory to the board that the person will not practice in the state for more than 120 days in the calendar year for which the permit is issued; and

pays the fee required under AS

08.84.050

.

The board may issue a limited permit to a person to practice physical therapy in the state as a visiting, nonresident physical therapist or physical therapy assistant, if the person

applies on the form provided by the board;

has not previously been denied physical therapy licensure in the state;

is licensed to practice physical therapy in another state;

provides proof satisfactory to the board that the person will not practice in the state for more than 120 days in the calendar year for which the permit is issued; and

pays the fee required under AS

08.84.050

.

A limited permit is valid for a period not exceeding 120 days in a calendar year.

A person may not receive more than three limited permits to practice occupational therapy or physical therapy during the person’s lifetime.

History.

(§ 13 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Sec. 08.84.080.
Examinations.

The board shall examine applicants for licensure under this chapter at the times and places it determines.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 26 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 8 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by examination, see 12 AAC 54, art. 1.

Sec. 08.84.090.
Licensure.

The board shall license an applicant who meets the qualifications for licensure under this chapter.
It shall issue a license certificate to each person licensed.
A license certificate is prima facie evidence of the right of the person to hold out as a licensed physical therapist, licensed physical therapy assistant, licensed occupational therapist, or licensed occupational therapy assistant.

History.

(§ 8 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 7 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 9 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

The word “licensed” was inserted ahead of “occupational therapist” and “occupational therapy assistant” in 1991 to correct a manifest error in § 15, ch. 2, FSSLA 1987.

Cross references. —

For professional designation requirements for physical therapists and occupational therapists licensed under this chapter, see AS

08.02.010

.

Sec. 08.84.100.
Renewal of license.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

If a license remains lapsed for more than three years, the board may require the applicant to submit proof, satisfactory to the board, of continued competency.

A license may not be renewed unless the applicant submits proof of continued competence to practice physical therapy or occupational therapy in a manner established by the board in regulations adopted under AS

08.84.010(b)

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 4 ch 49 SLA 1969; am § 8 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 54 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 48 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 16 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am §§ 42, 49 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For license duration and further provisions relating to renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy license renewal and continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 54, art. 3.

For occupational therapy license renewal and continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 54, art. 6.

Sec. 08.84.110.
Renewal fee. [Repealed, § 8 ch 49 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 08.84.120.
Refusal, revocation, and suspension of license.

The board may refuse to license an applicant, may refuse to renew the license of a person, and may suspend or revoke the license of a person who

has obtained or attempted to obtain a license by fraud or material misrepresentation;

uses drugs or alcohol in a manner that affects the person’s ability to practice physical therapy or occupational therapy competently and safely;

has been convicted of a state or federal felony or other crime that affects the person’s ability to practice competently and safely;

is guilty, in the judgment of the board, of gross negligence or malpractice or has engaged in conduct contrary to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession or the occupational therapy profession;

has continued to practice physical therapy or occupational therapy after becoming unfit due to physical or mental disability;

has failed to refer a patient to another qualified professional when the patient’s condition is beyond the training or ability of the person;

as a physical therapy assistant, has attempted to practice physical therapy that has not been initiated, supervised, and terminated by a licensed physical therapist; or

as an occupational therapy assistant, has attempted to practice occupational therapy that has not been supervised by a licensed occupational therapist.

The refusal or suspension of a license may be modified or rescinded if the person has been rehabilitated to the satisfaction of the board.

The board may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a licensee for the evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of a person through audio, video, or data communications when physically separated from the person if the licensee

or another licensed health care provider is available to provide follow-up care;

requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to a primary care provider if the licensee is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the licensee sends the records to the person’s primary care provider; and

meets the requirements established by the board in regulation.

The board shall adopt regulations restricting the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, and treatment of a person as authorized under (c) of this section by establishing standards of care, including standards for training, confidentiality, supervision, practice, and related issues.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 49 SLA 1969; am § 9 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 11 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 46 SLA 1986; am § 17 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 13 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in (a)(3) of this section, “affects” was substituted for “effects” to correct a manifest error in ch. 46, SLA 1986.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational therapy licensure, see 12 AAC 54, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (c) and (d).